Wyoming statutes. Title 42 Welfare
Chapter 10 Welfare Fraud Prevention Act

Editor's note. —

Laws 2016, ch. 103, § 1, enacted this Chapter as W.S.

42-9-101

through

42-9-107

. It has been redesignated as W.S.

42-10-101

through

42-10-107

at the direction of the Legislative Service Office.

Effective date. —

Laws 2016, ch. 103, §
3 makes the act effective July 1, 2016.

§ 42-10-101.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Identity information” includes the name, alias, date of birth, address, social security number and other related information of an applicant for or recipient of a public welfare benefit;

“Public welfare benefit” means as provided in W.S. 42-2-102(a)(vii).

History.

2016 ch. 103, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

§ 42-10-102.
Enhanced identity authentication process.

Prior to awarding any public welfare benefit the department may require an applicant to complete an identity authentication process that confirms the applicant owns the identity presented in the application. The identity authentication process under this section shall consist of financial or personal questions related to the applicant. The authentication process shall be available for applicant interviews in person or by telephone.

History.

2016 ch. 103, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

§ 42-10-103.
Enhanced eligibility verification process.

Prior to awarding any public welfare benefit, and on a quarterly basis after any benefit is awarded, the department shall, to the extent practicable, determine the following information as it relates to each applicant for or recipient of a public welfare benefit:

Earned and unearned income information maintained by the United States internal revenue service;

Weekly, monthly or quarterly reports of income and unemployment insurance payment information maintained by the department of workforce services;

Income information maintained by the United States social security administration;

Immigration status information maintained by the United States citizenship and immigration services;

Death register information maintained by the United States social security administration;

Prisoner information maintained by the United States social security administration;

Public housing and section 8 housing assistance payment information;

Fleeing felon, probation or parole violation information;

Wage reporting information maintained by states contiguous to Wyoming;

Beneficiary records and earnings information maintained by the United States social security administration in the beneficiary and earnings data exchange system;

Earnings and pension information maintained by the United States social security administration in the beneficiary earnings exchange record system;

Earnings and pension information maintained by the Wyoming retirement system;

Employment information maintained by the department of workforce services;

Employment information maintained by the United States department of health and human services in the national directory of new hires;

Supplemental security income information maintained by the United States social security administration in the social security income state data exchange system;

Veterans’ benefits information;

Child care services information maintained by the department;

Utility payment information maintained by the state under the low income home energy assistance program as provided in W.S.

42-2-501

;

Emergency utility payment information maintained by the state or local governmental entities; and

Income and employment information maintained by the department and the United States department of health and human services office of child support enforcement.

The department is authorized to enter into agreements with third-party vendors to obtain the following information prior to awarding any public welfare benefit, and on a quarterly basis after any benefit is awarded:

Information on public welfare benefits received in other states maintained in any real time national database, including the national accuracy clearinghouse;

A nationwide public records data source of physical asset ownership including real property, automobiles, watercraft, aircraft, luxury vehicles or any other vehicle;

A nationwide public records data source of incarcerated individuals;

A nationwide best available address and driver’s license data source to verify individuals are residents of Wyoming;

A comprehensive public records database that identifies potential identity fraud or identity theft which can closely associate name, social security number, date of birth, phone and address information; or

National and local financial institutions, in order to locate undisclosed depository accounts or verify account balances of disclosed accounts.

In addition to the records specified in subsections (a) and (b) of this section, the department may also consider information from any database or source which is substantially similar to or a successor of any record, database or information specified under this section.

History.

2016 ch. 103, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

§ 42-10-104.
Case review process.

If the department finds a discrepancy or change in circumstances as a result of the activities required by W.S.

42-10-102

or

42-10-103

, the department shall review the case using the following procedures:

If the discrepancy or change in circumstances does not affect eligibility, the department shall take no further action;

If the discrepancy or change in circumstances may affect eligibility, the department shall:

Promptly make a determination of the effect of the discrepancy or change in circumstances on the eligibility of the applicant or recipient; and

Provide written notice to the applicant or recipient describing in detail the circumstances of the discrepancy or change in circumstances, the manner in which the applicant or recipient may respond and the consequences of failing to take any action. The department shall give the applicant or recipient an opportunity to explain the discrepancy or change in circumstances.

The applicant or recipient shall respond within ten (10) business days from the date of the written notice of the discrepancy or change in circumstances;

If an applicant or recipient does not respond to a notice of a discrepancy or change in circumstances as provided in paragraph (ii) of this subsection and the department determines that the discrepancy or change in circumstances affects eligibility for a public welfare benefit, the department shall provide a written decision of the intent to deny, reduce the benefit or close the benefit case;

If an applicant or recipient responds to a notice of a discrepancy or change in circumstances as provided in paragraph (ii) of this subsection, the department shall investigate and make a determination of whether or not the discrepancy or change in circumstances has been resolved and determine the applicant’s or recipient’s eligibility for public welfare benefits. The decision of the department shall be provided to the applicant or recipient in writing;

A written decision of the department under this section shall constitute a final decision of the department subject to judicial review as provided in W.S.

16-3-114

.

History.

2016 ch. 103, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(iii), substituted “ten (10)” for “thirty (30).”

§ 42-10-105.
Referral of cases for investigation.

After review of a discrepancy or change in circumstances under W.S.

42-10-104

, if the department finds that there is inadequate documentation or upon reasonable suspicion that there is fraud, misrepresentation, identity theft or another violation of law the department shall:

Refer the case to the fraud and recovery unit for investigation, recovery of improper payments and collection of civil penalties, if applicable and, if appropriate, referral to prosecuting authorities for criminal prosecution;

Refer the information to other agencies, divisions or departments as appropriate for review of eligibility in public programs.

To the extent the department encounters an individual enrolled in Medicaid who the department has reason to believe is not eligible for Medicaid, the department shall inform the individual and the Wyoming Medicaid program of the reason the department does not believe the individual is eligible.

History.

2016 ch. 103, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, added (b).

§ 42-10-106.
Report.

Not later than November 30 of 2017, 2018 and 2020 the department shall report to the governor and the joint labor, health and social services interim committee on the effectiveness of the eligibility verification system and the number of cases referred under W.S.

42-10-105

including information on the outcome of the cases, if available, and on the cost to the department of the system.

History.

2016 ch. 103, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

§ 42-10-107.
Rulemaking authority.

The department shall promulgate rules necessary to implement this chapter.

History.

2016 ch. 103, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.